Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 76 Sexual Harassment in Higher Education

16-76-1.
“Sexual harassment” defined.

As used in this chapter, “sexual harassment” means any unwelcome sexual advances or requests for sexual favors or any other verbal or physical conduct of a sexual nature when submission to this conduct or advances or requests is made either explicitly or implicitly a term or condition of an individual’s academic success.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 68, § 1.

16-76-2.
Policies to respond to sexual harassment — Annual report.

Every institution of higher learning in the state shall develop a written policy to respond to sexual harassment and shall report to the general assembly on or before February 15 of each year on the status and implementation of that policy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 68, § 1.

16-76-3.
Penalty.

Any institution which fails to comply with this chapter shall be subject to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 68, § 1.